Arkansas, session 2025, HB1089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Waterways Commission for the 2025-
2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) B009C ACOM DIRECTOR WATERWAYS COMMISSION 1 GRADE GS11
(2) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(3) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 3
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
*MAH003*
04-03-2025 16:18:50 MAH003

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1089
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Commerce - Arkansas Waterways Commission for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $171,883
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 63,856
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 88,879
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 8,151
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) STATE'S CONTRIBUTIONS 2,555
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $335,324

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - WATERWAY DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Arkansas Port, Intermodal, and Waterway Development Grant Program Fund, for
grants to port authorities and intermodal authorities under the Arkansas
Port, Intermodal, and Waterway Development Grant Program for port development
projects as defined by Arkansas Code 15-23-205 for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) WATERWAY DEVELOPMENT GRANTS $5,000,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS RIVER NAVIGATION SYSTEM FUND.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the Arkansas River Navigation System Fund, for expenses for the
development, improvement, and expansion of river transportation resources
within the portion of the McClellan-Kerr Arkansas River Navigation System
located in the State of Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
04-03-2025 16:18:50 MAH003

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1089
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS RIVER NAVIGATION SYSTEM
EXPENSES $2,000,000

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
04-03-2025 16:18:50 MAH003

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1089
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

































04-03-2025 16:18:50 MAH003